Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5121YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 2476 Section 1. Section 321.189, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. Autism spectrum disorder Nonapparent disability 3 status. A licensee who has a nonapparent disability, 4 including autism spectrum disorder, as defined in section 5 514C.28 , a mental disability, as defined in section 915.37, a 6 developmental disability, as defined in section 335.25, or any 7 other intellectual disability, may request that the license 8 be marked to reflect the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 9 nonapparent disability status on the face of the license when 10 the licensee applies for the issuance or renewal of a license. 11 A licensee may choose to have the face of the personâs license 12 marked with a butterfly design approved by the department, or 13 in a manner the department determines is sufficient to signify 14 the person has a nonapparent disability. The department may 15 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing criteria under 16 which a license may be marked, including requiring the licensee 17 to submit medical proof of the licenseeâs autism spectrum 18 disorder nonapparent disability status. When a driverâs 19 license is so marked, the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 20 nonapparent disability status shall be noted in the electronic 21 database used by the department and law enforcement to access 22 registration, titling, and driverâs license information. The 23 department, in consultation with the department of health 24 and human services, shall develop educational media to raise 25 awareness of a licenseeâs ability to request the license be 26 marked to reflect the licenseeâs autism spectrum disorder 27 nonapparent disability status. 28 Sec. 2. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph b, 29 subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 (6) An applicant for a nonoperatorâs identification 31 card who has autism spectrum disorder, as defined in section 32 514C.28 a nonapparent disability, as described in section 33 321.189, subsection 10 , may request that the card be marked to 34 reflect the applicantâs autism spectrum disorder nonapparent 35 -1- LSB 5121YH (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2476 disability status on the face of the card when the applicant 1 applies for the issuance or renewal of a card. An applicant 2 may choose to have the face of the personâs card marked with 3 a butterfly design approved by the department, or in a manner 4 the department determines is sufficient to signify the person 5 has a nonapparent disability. The department may adopt rules 6 pursuant to chapter 17A establishing criteria under which a 7 card may be marked, including requiring the applicant to submit 8 medical proof of the applicantâs autism spectrum disorder 9 nonapparent disability status. The department, in consultation 10 with the department of health and human services, shall develop 11 educational media to raise awareness of an applicantâs ability 12 to request the card be marked to reflect the applicantâs autism 13 spectrum disorder nonapparent disability status. 14